North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-33 Taxation of Rural Electric Cooperatives [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33-01.
Cooperatives subject to taxation — Classification. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33-02.
Personal property defined. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33-03.
Report of gross receipts. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33-04.
Tax imposed in lieu of personal property tax — Privilege tax imposed by city. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33-05.
Apportionment of tax. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33-06.
Duty of county auditor. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33-07.
Allocation of proceeds of tax — Duty of county treasurer. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]